chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число

%>                   ! Граница морфемы

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON PLURAL

             # ; 
%<pl%>:%>сем # ;

LEXICON N 

%<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам%<n%>:урам # ;   ! "улица"
пахча%<n%>:пахча # ; ! "сад"
хула%<n%>:хула # ;   ! "город"
канаш%<n%>:канаш # ; ! "совет"
